New Mexico, session 2026, SB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of northern New Mexico state school for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to contract for the production of an educational documentary about one of New Mexico's historical figures, Padre Antonio Jose Martinez. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233440.1